Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
MEMBERS AND OWNERSHIP

7-56-301. Members.

Subject to the provisions of this section and under the terms and conditions prescribed in the articles or bylaws adopted by it, a cooperative may limit admission as members or issue common stock only to persons engaged in the particular business or utilizing the goods or services provided by or through the cooperative, including any entity formed under the law of this state or any other jurisdiction, or may admit as members or issue common stock to any person meeting uniform terms and conditions stated in its articles or bylaws.

When any required membership fee or payment for stock as required in the articles, the bylaws, or a resolution of the board has been paid in full or a promissory note executed for the required membership fee or capital subscription, a cooperative may issue a certificate of membership or common stock evidencing the membership or ownership of the stock or may evidence the same on the books or other records of the cooperative as determined by the articles, the bylaws, or the board. Except for a cooperative formed with stock, promissory notes of members may not be accepted by the cooperative as full or partial payment for stock unless permitted by the bylaws and adequately secured. The cooperative shall hold the stock as security for the payment of the note, but such retention as security shall not affect the member's right to vote.

No member shall have a right to vote until the required membership fee or payment for stock has been paid in full.

A cooperative, in its articles or bylaws, may limit the amount of common stock that a member may own.

No member shall be liable directly or indirectly, including by way of indemnification, contribution, or otherwise, under a judgment, decree, or order of a court, or in any other manner, for a debt, obligation, or liability of or chargeable to the cooperative while it is incorporated for an amount exceeding the sum remaining unpaid on the member's membership fee or the member's subscription to the stock, including any unpaid balance on any promissory note given in payment thereof; except that this subsection (5) shall not affect the liability of a member who is also a member of the board or an officer for such member's negligence, wrongful act, or misconduct in that capacity.

A cooperative formed with or without capital stock under this article may issue or accept investments in nonvoting stock or equity that may have such rights and preferences, including being subject to per unit retains or allocations of net margins, as may be provided in the articles, the bylaws, or by the board. Such nonvoting stock or equity may be issued and sold by the cooperative to any person, including those persons not otherwise qualified to be members, and may be redeemable or retireable by the cooperative on such terms and conditions as are provided for in the articles, the bylaws, or a resolution of the board providing for the issuance of or the investment in the nonvoting stock or equity. The terms and conditions of redemption shall be printed on any certificate evidencing the stock or equity.

A cooperative shall impose restrictions on the transfer of voting common stock or membership in the cooperative in its bylaws in accordance with section 7-56-208 (2), and may also impose such restrictions in its articles, and may impose restrictions on the transfer of other equity investments in the cooperative in its articles, bylaws, or by resolution of its board. Any such restriction shall be printed upon any certificate or other written evidence of the membership, voting common stock, or other equity investment if one is issued.

Subject to the provisions of section 7-56-406 (2)(c), a cooperative may, at any time as stated in its articles, bylaws, or resolution of the board adopted at the time of issuance, acquire, recall, redeem, exchange, or reissue its common stock, memberships, preferred stock, preferred equity, memberships, or other equity capital. Consideration paid for stock, memberships, or other equity capital acquired, recalled, redeemed, exchanged, or reissued by the cooperative shall be the par value, stated value, price originally paid, or book value, whichever is less, as conclusively determined by the board, plus any accrued and unpaid dividends, if any, and, if the price originally paid for the stock, memberships, or other equity capital included an additional amount based upon the right of the holder to engage in business with the cooperative, the consideration shall include the additional amount. If stock, memberships, or other equity capital acquired, recalled, redeemed, or exchanged does not have a par value, then the par value shall not be considered in determining the consideration. The cooperative may set off against the consideration to be paid obligations to it of the holder of stock, membership, or other equity capital and shall have a continuing perfected security interest in the stock, membership, and other equity capital of a member, stockholder, or holder of other equity capital to secure payment of any indebtedness to the cooperative of the stockholder, member, or holder of other equity capital, whenever indebtedness is incurred. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the security interest shall take priority over all other perfected security interests. No acquisition, recall, or redemption shall be made if the result of it would be to bring the value of the remaining assets of the cooperative below the aggregate of its indebtedness. The articles or bylaws may provide other limitations on the right of a cooperative to acquire, recall, redeem, exchange, or reissue its stock, memberships, or other equity capital.

If a member of a cooperative is other than an individual, such member may be represented by any individual, associate, officer, manager, member, shareholder, or other equity holder thereof duly authorized in writing by the member's board or other governing body having the right to authorize the representation.

If so prescribed in its articles or bylaws, a cooperative may group its members in districts, or other units, or by types of goods or services utilized, for administration or otherwise achieving the purposes of the cooperative.

A cooperative, in its articles or bylaws, may limit the amount of common stock or other equity capital held by members or other persons.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 493, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(12) repealed, p. 612, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (2), (6), and (8) amended, p. 2224, § 77, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(9) amended, p. 1413, § 44, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-56-108 and 7-56-116 as they existed prior to 1996.

7-56-302. Member meetings - how called - notice.

In its bylaws, each cooperative shall provide for one or more regular member meetings annually. Either the board or such officers as are designated in the bylaws shall have the right to call a special meeting of the members at any time, and the president, or other officer designated in the bylaws, shall call a special meeting to be held within sixty days upon petition by ten percent of the total number of members stating the specific business to be brought before the meeting. The board or the person calling the special meeting shall determine the date, time, and place of the meeting.

Written notice of all member meetings shall be mailed to each member at that member's last-known address or transmitted to each member in such other manner as may be provided in the bylaws at least ten days prior to the meeting. Notice of any special meeting shall include a statement of the purpose for the meeting. At all regular meetings of members of the cooperative, any and all lawful business may be brought before the meeting regardless of whether stated in the notice of the meeting; except that amendments to the articles or the bylaws of the cooperative or other action required to be stated in the notice of the meeting by this article shall not be subject to action unless notice thereof is stated in the notice of the meeting. At all special meetings of the members of the cooperative, business brought before the meeting shall be limited to the purpose stated in the notice.

Actions taken or agreed to be taken during a member meeting shall not be invalidated on account of any member's failure to receive notice of a meeting if reasonable effort has been made to give notice in accordance with this section.

Lawful actions or other membership votes may be taken by the cooperative in lieu of or without a member meeting if all members entitled to act or vote with respect to the action agree to that action by unanimous written consent.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 495, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2225, § 78, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-112 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-303. Members' list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a meeting of the membership, the cooperative shall prepare a list of the names and addresses of all its members who are entitled to be given notice of the meeting. The members' list shall be available for inspection by any member or member's agent or attorney, for a proper corporate purpose, beginning the earlier of ten days before the meeting for which the list was prepared or two business days after notice of the meeting is given and continuing through the meeting, and any adjournment thereof. Section 7-56-307 is not applicable to this section.

The cooperative shall make the members' list available at the meeting, and any member or member's agent or attorney is entitled to inspect the list at any time and for a proper corporate purpose during the meeting or any adjournment.

If the cooperative refuses to allow a member or the member's agent or attorney to inspect the members' list before or at the meeting, as permitted by subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the member may apply to the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the cooperative's principal office is located or, if the cooperative has no principal office in this state, to the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the cooperative has no registered agent, to the district court for the city and county of Denver for an order permitting the member or the member's agent or attorney to inspect the members' list.

The court may order inspection of the members' list pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, unless the cooperative proves that it refused inspection or copying of the list in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the member or the agent or attorney of the member to inspect or copy the members' list. The court may also postpone or adjourn the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection ordered by the court is complete. In any such action:

The court may order the losing party to pay the prevailing party's reasonable costs, including reasonable attorney fees;

The court may order the losing party to pay the prevailing party for any damages the prevailing party shall have incurred by reason of the subject matter of the litigation;

If inspection or copying is ordered pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the court may order the cooperative to pay the member's inspection and copying expenses; and

The court may grant either party any other remedy provided by law.

If a court orders inspection of the members' list pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the court may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the list by the member.

Failure to prepare or make available the members' list does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 495, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 2225, § 79, effective July 1, 2004.

Cross references:

Section 7-56-307 (6) provides that the provisions of said section do not apply to this section.

7-56-304. Quorum.

A quorum for conducting business at all meetings of the members shall be five percent of the total number of members or thirty members present in person at the meeting, whichever is less. Members present and voting in person or in any other manner authorized by the cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-305 (1) shall be counted toward the quorum with respect to that matter. Nothing shall prevent the articles or the bylaws of a cooperative from requiring a greater number of members or percentage thereof as a quorum.

An action by a cooperative is not valid in the absence of a quorum at the meeting at which the action was taken, unless the action taken is subsequently ratified by the required number of members.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 497, § 1, effective July 1.

7-56-305. Member voting.

Members of a cooperative may vote either in person or, if provided in the articles or the bylaws of the cooperative or a resolution of the board with respect to a particular issue, by any of the following methods:

Mail or electronic transmission if a means is provided to verify that a member so voting has received the exact wording of the matter upon which the vote is to be taken;

Telecommunication; or

Any other means by which all persons in the meeting may communicate with each other during the meeting.

Whenever in this article reference is made to voting by membership, the vote may be taken in any manner established pursuant to this section unless specifically provided otherwise in this article or by the board with respect to a particular matter upon which the vote is to be taken.

With respect to a matter where a vote has been cast by an authorized means other than the person being present and voting in person, the person casting the vote shall be counted as present and voting for purposes of those provisions in this article that refer to persons "present and voting".

Proxy or cumulative voting shall be prohibited except as permitted by the articles or bylaws of organizations incorporated prior to July 6, 1973; except that, where a member is other than an individual, its vote may be cast by a representative authorized pursuant to this article.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, each member of a cooperative formed under this article shall be entitled to one vote only.

Any cooperative formed under this article may provide in its articles for proportional voting rights allowing members more than one vote based upon the patronage of a member with the cooperative, the amount of patronage equity held in the cooperative, or any combination of these methods. However, no member may be entitled to more than one vote in any case where a law of this state specifically requires otherwise. In no event shall any member have less than one vote and no member may have more than two and one-half percent of the total votes of members of the cooperative. If the number of members in the cooperative is such that, solely by virtue of the number of members, one member may have more than two and one-half percent based on proportional voting, then each member of the cooperative shall be entitled to one vote only.

Unless otherwise provided in this article or in the cooperative's articles, when a cooperative has provided for proportional voting, it shall be deemed to have intended that the references in this article to a vote of a specified proportion of members or similar terminology as necessary for approval of a matter submitted to a membership vote shall mean a determination based on a proportion of the total votes entitled to be cast or actually cast by members as applicable in the particular reference.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 497, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 2225, § 80, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1413, § 45, effective July 1.

7-56-306. Reserves, distributions, and patronage refunds.

A cooperative shall periodically set aside a portion of net margins, per unit retains, or other funds that is reasonable as determined by the board or in accordance with the articles or bylaws, for reserves, distributions, patronage refunds, capital, or other lawful business purposes.

Net margins, after deductions for reasonable reserves and for allowances for income tax, shall be calculated and allocated on a patronage basis at least once every twelve months to members or to members and other qualified persons on an equitable basis as determined by the board or in accordance with the articles or bylaws. This section shall not be construed as prohibiting the retention of net margins, excess per unit retains, or other funds allocated to members as a means of providing capital for the cooperative.

If a cooperative has retained net margins or other funds allocated to members, the board shall have the right in accordance with the articles, bylaws, and policies established by the board to redeem or retire the net margins or other funds so retained. All decisions relating to the redemption or retirement of such funds shall be made solely by the board.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 498, § 1, effective July 1.

7-56-307. Inspection of cooperative records by member.

A member is entitled to inspect and copy, at the member's expense, during regular business hours at a reasonable location stated by the cooperative, any of the records described in section 7-56-107 (4) if the member meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section and gives the cooperative written demand at least five business days before the date on which the member wishes to inspect and copy such records. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (1) or any provisions of section 7-56-107 (4), no member shall have the right to inspect or copy any records of the cooperative relating to the amount of equity capital in the cooperative held by any person or any accounts receivable or other amounts due the cooperative from any person.

To be entitled to inspect and copy permitted records, the member shall meet the following requirements:

The member has been a member for at least one year immediately preceding the demand to inspect or copy or is a member holding at least five percent of all of the outstanding equity interests in the cooperative as of the date the demand is made;

The demand is made in good faith and for a proper corporate business purpose;

The member describes with reasonable particularity the purpose and the records the member desires to inspect; and

The records are directly connected with the described purpose.

The right of inspection granted by this section may not be abolished or limited by the articles, bylaws, or any actions of the board or the members.

This section does not affect:

The right of a member to inspect records to the same extent as any other litigant if the member is in litigation with the cooperative; or

The power of a court to compel the production of the cooperative's records for examination.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, if the records of the cooperative to be inspected or copied are in active use or storage and, therefore, not available at the time otherwise provided for inspection or copying, the cooperative shall notify the member of this fact and shall set a date and hour within three business days of the date otherwise set in this section for the inspection or copying.

This section shall not apply to section 7-56-303.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 499, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2226, § 81, effective July 1, 2004.

7-56-308. Scope of member's inspection right.

A member's agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the member.

The right to copy records under section 7-56-307 includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic copying, or other means.

The cooperative may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the member. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production and reproduction of the records.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 500, § 1, effective July 1.

7-56-309. Court-ordered inspection.

If a cooperative refuses to allow a member, or the member's agent or attorney, who complies with section 7-56-307 to inspect or copy any records that the member is entitled to inspect or copy by said section within a prescribed time limit or, if none, within a reasonable time, the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the cooperative's principal office is located or, if the cooperative has no principal office in this state, the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the cooperative has no registered agent, the district court for the city and county of Denver, may, on application of the member, summarily order the inspection or copying of the records demanded at the cooperative's expense.

If a court orders inspection or copying of the records demanded, unless the cooperative proves that it refused inspection or copying in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the member or the member's agent or attorney to inspect or copy the records demanded:

The court may order the losing party to pay the prevailing party's reasonable costs, including reasonable attorney fees;

The court may order the losing party to pay the prevailing party for any damages the prevailing party shall have incurred by reason of the subject matter of the litigation;

If inspection or copying is ordered pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court may order the cooperative to pay the member's inspection and copying expenses notwithstanding the provisions of section 7-56-307 (1); and

The court may grant either party any other remedy provided by law.

If a court orders inspection or copying of records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding member.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 500, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2226, § 82, effective July 1, 2004.